Louisiana, session 2026, HB493.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:3306(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3306. General powers and duties of the board
* * *
F. The board may expropriate property subject to and in accordance with
R.S. 48:441-460 R.S. 48:441 through 460, where applicable; however, the board
shall not expropriate property within the parishes of East Feliciana and St. Helena.
The owner of residential property or commercial property, including homes,
businesses, barns, outbuildings and churches, shall be paid the replacement cost of
any such property expropriated by the board.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-65 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 493